Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
JURISDICTION AND VENUE

§587A-5 Jurisdiction. Pursuant to
section 571‑11(9), the court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction:

(1) In a child protective proceeding concerning any
child who is or was found within the State at the time specified facts and
circumstances occurred, are discovered, or are reported to the department.
These facts and circumstances constitute the basis for the court's finding that
the child's physical or psychological health or welfare is subject to imminent
harm, has been harmed, or is subject to threatened harm by the acts or
omissions of the child's family; and

(2) In any prior child protective proceeding under
chapter 587, the former Child Protective Act. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L
2011, c 51, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next